California statutes. Corporations Code
 where it is payable; fix, or if proceedings or filings with any governmental or other agency for any qualification, permit, registration or exemption therefrom are required as a condition precedent to the levy or payment of an assessment provide for the establishment of, a date on which the assessment is payable; fix a date, not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date on which the assessment is payable, on which such assessment becomes delinquent if not paid; and fix a date, not less than 15 nor more than 60 days from the date on which the unpaid assessment becomes delinquent, for the sale of delinquent shares. The levy also shall fix the hour and place of sale, which place shall be in the county where the corporation is required to keep a copy of its bylaws pursuant to Section 213, or if there is no such county, in Sacramento.

(c) On or before the date an assessment is payable, the secretary of the corporation shall give notice thereof in substantially the following form:

(Name of corporation in full. Location of principal office.)

Notice is hereby given that the board of directors on (date) has levied an assessment of (amount) per share upon the (name or designation of class or series of shares) of the corporation payable (to whom and where). Any shares upon which this assessment remains unpaid on (date fixed) will be delinquent. Unless payment is made before delinquency, the said shares, or as many of them as may be necessary, will be sold at (particular place) on (date) at (hour) of such date, to pay the delinquent assessment, together with a penalty of 5 percent of the amount of the assessment on such shares, or be forfeited
 to the corporation. (Name of secretary with location of office.)

(d) The notice shall be served personally upon each holder of record of shares assessed; provided, however, that in lieu of personal service the notice may be mailed to each such shareholder addressed to the last address of the shareholder appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the shareholder to the corporation for the purpose of notice, or if no such address appears or is given, at the place where the principal office of the corporation is located, and published once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the corporation is located. If there is no such newspaper in such county, the publication shall be made in some newspaper of general circulation in an adjoining county.

(e) The assessment is a lien upon the shares assessed from the time of personal service or the publication of the notice of assessment, unless the articles provide for such lien from the time of the levy. Unless otherwise provided by law, a transfer of the shares on the books of the corporation after the lien of an assessment has attached is a waiver of the lien unless a conspicuous legend is placed on the face of any certificate issued upon such transfer or, in the case of uncertificated securities, on the initial transaction statement, setting forth the information contained in the notice required by subdivision (c). Such legend shall be removed if the assessment on the shares evidenced by the certificate is paid or if the shares are sold to pay the assessment or forfeited for nonpayment.

(f) The date of sale of delinquent
 shares fixed in any levy of an assessment may be extended from time to time for not more than 30 days at a time by order of the board entered on the records of the corporation, or when the sale is restrained by order of a court. Notice of such extension shall be given by announcement by the secretary, or other person authorized to conduct the sale, made at the time and place of sale last theretofore fixed.

If a date of sale of delinquent shares is extended for more than five days the corporation shall cause a notice to be mailed to the shareholder or shareholders whose shares are to be the subject of such sale setting forth the date and time to which the date of sale
 has been extended.

(g) If payment is made after delinquency and before the sale, the shareholder shall pay a penalty of 5 percent of the amount of the assessment on the shares in addition to the assessment.

(h) At the place and time appointed in the notice of levy any officer or an agent of the corporation, shall, unless otherwise ordered by the board, sell or cause to be sold to the highest bidder for cash as many shares of each delinquent holder of the assessed shares as may be necessary to pay the assessment and charges
 thereon according to the notice.

The person offering at the sale to pay the assessment and penalty for the smallest number of shares is the highest bidder. The shares purchased shall be transferred to the highest bidder on the share register of the corporation on the payment of the assessment and penalty and a new certificate or initial transaction statement therefor issued to such highest bidder.

A corporation is not required to accept an offer for a fraction of a share.

(i) If no bidder offers to pay the amount due on the shares, together with the penalty of 5 percent thereof, the shares shall be forfeited to the corporation in satisfaction of the assessment and penalty thereon.

(j) After a sale or forfeiture of shares for nonpayment of an assessment, the holder or owner of delinquent shares shall, if they are certificated securities, surrender the certificate for such shares to the corporation for cancellation or, if they are uncertificated securities, have no further rights with respect to such shares. This duty may be enforced by order or decree of court and such holder or owner shall be liable for damages to the corporation for failure to surrender the certificate for cancellation upon demand without good cause or excuse.

Any certificate not so surrendered forthwith becomes null and void and ceases to be evidence of the right or title of the holder or any transferee to the shares purporting to be represented thereby, and neither the corporation nor the purchaser of such shares incurs any liability thereon to any such
 transferee.

The purchaser of any shares, at a sale for delinquent assessments thereon, whenever made, is entitled to the issue of a new certificate representing the shares so purchased.

(k) The certificate of the secretary or assistant secretary of the corporation is prima facie evidence of the time and place of sale and any postponement thereof, of the quantity and particular description of the shares sold, to whom, for what price, and of the fact of payment of the purchase money. The certificate shall be filed in the office of the corporation, and copies of the certificate, certified by the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, are prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.

(l) An assessment is not invalidated
 by a failure to publish the notice of assessment, nor by the nonperformance of any act required in order to enforce the payment of the assessment; but in case of any substantial error or omission in the course of proceedings for collection of an assessment on any shares, all previous proceedings, except the levy of the assessment, are void as to such shares, and shall be taken anew.

(m) No action shall be maintained to recover shares sold for delinquent assessments, upon the ground of irregularity in the assessment, irregularity or defect of the notice of sale, or defect or irregularity in the sale, unless the party seeking to maintain the action first pays or tenders to the corporation, or the party holding the shares sold, the sum for which the shares were sold, together with all subsequent assessments which may have been paid thereon and
 interest on such sums from the time they were paid. No such action shall be maintained unless it is commenced by the filing of a complaint and the issuing of a summons thereon within six months after the sale was made.

(n) The only remedy for the collection of an assessment on fully paid shares is sale or forfeiture of the shares unless (1) remedy by action is expressly authorized in the original articles or by an amendment of the articles adopted before August 21, 1933, or by an amendment adopted on or after August 21, 1933, by unanimous consent of the shareholders, and (2) unless a statement of such remedy appears on the face of any share certificate issued on or after August 21, 1933.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 12.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Dividends and Reacquisitions of Shares [500. - 511.]

500.

(a) Neither a corporation nor any of its subsidiaries shall make any distribution to the corporation’s shareholders (Section 166) unless the board of directors has determined in good faith either of the following:

(1) The amount of retained earnings of the corporation immediately prior to the distribution equals or exceeds the sum of (A) the amount of the proposed distribution plus (B) the preferential dividends arrears amount.

(2) Immediately after the distribution, the value of the corporation’s assets would equal or exceed the sum of its total liabilities plus the preferential rights amount.

(b) For the purpose of applying paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (a) to a distribution by a corporation, “preferential dividends arrears amount” means the amount, if any, of cumulative dividends in arrears on all shares having a preference with respect to payment of dividends over the class or series to which the applicable distribution is being made, provided that if the articles of incorporation provide that a distribution can be made without regard to preferential dividends arrears amount, then the preferential dividends arrears amount shall be zero. For the purpose of applying paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to a distribution by a corporation, “preferential rights amount” means the amount that would be needed if the corporation were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution to satisfy the preferential rights, including accrued but unpaid dividends, of other shareholders upon dissolution that are superior to the rights of the shareholders receiving the distribution, provided that if the articles of incorporation provide that a distribution can be
 made without regard to any preferential rights, then the preferential rights amount shall be zero. In the case of a distribution of cash or property in payment by the corporation in connection with the purchase of its shares, (1) there shall be added to retained earnings all amounts that had been previously deducted therefrom with respect to obligations incurred in connection with the corporation’s repurchase of its shares and reflected on the corporation’s balance sheet, but not in excess of the principal of the obligations that remain unpaid immediately prior to the distribution and (2) there shall be deducted from liabilities all amounts that had been previously added thereto with respect to the obligations incurred in connection with the corporation’s repurchase of its shares and reflected on the corporation’s balance sheet, but not in excess of the principal of the obligations that will remain unpaid after the distribution, provided that no addition to retained earnings or deduction from liabilities
 under this subdivision shall occur on account of any obligation that is a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders (Section 166) at the time the obligation is incurred.

(c) The board of directors may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subdivision (a) or under Section 501 on any of the following:

(1) Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable under the circumstances.

(2) A fair valuation.

(3) Any other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(d) The effect of a distribution under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) is measured as of the date the distribution is authorized if the
 payment occurs within 120 days after the date of authorization.

(e) (1) If terms of indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest is to be made only if, and to the extent that, payment of a distribution to shareholders could then be made under this section, indebtedness of a corporation, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of determinations made under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness shall be treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment of the indebtedness is actually made.

(f) This section does not apply to a corporation licensed as a broker-dealer under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section
 25210) of Part 3 of Division 1 of Title 4, if immediately after giving effect to any distribution the corporation is in compliance with the net capital rules of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation and the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 45.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

Neither a corporation nor any of its subsidiaries shall make any distribution to the corporation’s shareholders (Section 166) if the corporation or the subsidiary making the distribution is, or as a result thereof would be, likely to be unable to meet its liabilities (except those whose payment is otherwise adequately provided for) as they mature.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

(a) The provisions of Sections 500 and 501 shall not apply to a purchase or redemption of shares of a deceased shareholder from the proceeds of insurance on the life of that shareholder in excess of the total amount of all premiums paid by the corporation for that insurance, in order to carry out the provisions of an agreement between the corporation and that shareholder to purchase or redeem those shares upon
 the death of the shareholder.

(b) The provisions of Sections 500 and 501 shall not apply to the purchase or redemption of shares of a disabled shareholder from the proceeds of disability insurance applicable to the disabled shareholder in excess of the total amount of all premiums paid by the corporation for the insurance, in order to carry out the provisions of an agreement between the corporation and the shareholder to purchase or redeem shares upon the disability of the shareholder as defined within that policy. For the purposes of this subdivision, “disability insurance” means an agreement of indemnification against the insured’s loss of the ability to work due to accident or illness.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 203, Sec. 5.   (AB 571)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

(a) The provisions of Section 500 do not apply to a dividend declared by either of the following:

(1) A regulated investment company, as defined in the federal Internal Revenue Code, as amended, to the extent that the dividend is necessary to maintain the status of the corporation as a regulated investment company under the provisions of that code.

(2) A real estate investment trust, as defined in Part II of
 Subchapter M of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as amended, to the extent that the dividend is necessary to maintain the status of the corporation as a real estate investment trust under the provisions of that code.

(b) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to any purchase or redemption of shares redeemable at the option of the holder by a registered open-end investment company under the United States Investment Company Act of 1940, so long as the right of redemption remains unsuspended under the provisions of that statute and the articles and bylaws of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits additional restrictions upon the declaration of dividends or the purchase or redemption of a corporation’s own shares by provision in the articles or bylaws or in any indenture or other agreement entered into by the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

(a) Any shareholder who receives any distribution prohibited by this chapter with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof is liable to the corporation for the benefit of all of the creditors or shareholders entitled to institute an action under subdivision (b) for the amount so received by the shareholder with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until paid, but not exceeding the
 liabilities of the corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation and the injury suffered by nonconsenting shareholders, as the case may be. For purposes of determining the value of any noncash property received in a distribution described in the preceding sentence, the shareholder receiving that illegal distribution shall be liable to the corporation for an amount equal to the fair market value of the property at the time of the illegal distribution plus interest thereon from the date of the distribution at the legal rate on judgments until paid, together with all reasonably incurred costs of appraisal or other valuation, if any, of that property, but not exceeding the liabilities of the corporation owed to nonconsenting creditors at the time of the violation and the injury suffered by nonconsenting shareholders, as the case may be.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability (1) to
 creditors arising under subdivision (a) for a violation of Section 500 or 501 against any or all shareholders liable by any one or more creditors of the corporation whose debts or claims arose prior to the time of the distribution to shareholders and who have not consented thereto, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment, or (2) to shareholders arising under subdivision (a) for a violation of Section 500 against any or all shareholders liable by one or more holders of shares having preferential rights with respect to cumulative dividends in arrears, in the case of a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 500, or upon dissolution, in the case of a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 500, in each case who have not consented to the applicable distribution, without regard to the provisions in Section 800, and in each case to the extent the applicable shares with preferential rights were outstanding at the time of the distribution; provided that holders of
 shares of preferential rights shall not have the right to bring suit in the name of the corporation under this subdivision unless the preferential dividends arrears amount, in the case of a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 500, or the preferential rights amount, in the case of a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 500, was greater than zero. A cause of action with respect to an obligation to return a distribution pursuant to this section shall be extinguished unless the action is brought within four years after the date the distribution is made.

(c) Any shareholder sued under this section may implead all other shareholders liable under this section and may compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against shareholders not joined in that action.

(d) Nothing contained in this section affects any liability
 which any shareholder may have under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 203, Sec. 8.   (AB 571)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

This chapter does not apply in connection with any proceeding for winding up and dissolution under Chapter 18 or 19.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

509.

(a) A corporation may redeem any or all shares which are redeemable at its option by (1) giving notice of redemption as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) or as otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation, and (2) payment or deposit of the redemption price of the shares as provided in its articles or deposit of the redemption price pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) Subject to any provisions in the articles with respect to the notice required for redemption of shares, the corporation may give notice of the redemption of any or all shares subject to redemption by causing a notice of redemption to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal
 office of the corporation is located at least once a week for two successive weeks, in each instance on any day of the week, commencing not earlier than 60 nor later than 20 days before the date fixed for redemption. The notice of redemption shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The class or series of shares or part of any class or series of shares to be redeemed.

(2) The date fixed for redemption.

(3) The redemption price.

(4) If the shares are certificated securities, the place at which the shareholders may obtain payment of the redemption price upon surrender of their share certificates.

(c) If
 the corporation gives notice of redemption pursuant to subdivision (b), it shall also mail a copy of the notice of redemption to each holder of record of shares to be redeemed as of the date of mailing or record date fixed in accordance with Section 701, addressed to the holder at the address of such holder appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the holder to the corporation for the purpose of notice, or if no such address appears or is given at the place where the principal office of the corporation is located, not earlier than 60 nor later than 20 days before the date fixed for redemption. Failure to comply with this subdivision does not invalidate the redemption of the shares.

(d) If, on or before any date fixed for redemption of redeemable shares, the corporation deposits with any bank or trust company in this state as a
 trust fund, (1) a sum sufficient to redeem, on the date fixed for redemption thereof, the shares called for redemption, (2) in the case of the redemption of any uncertificated securities, an officer’s certificate setting forth the holders thereof registered on the books of the corporation and the number of shares held by each, and (3) irrevocable instructions and authority to the bank or trust company to publish the notice of redemption thereof (or to complete publication if theretofore commenced) and to pay, on and after the date fixed for redemption or prior thereto, the redemption price of the shares to their respective holders upon the surrender of their share certificates, in the case of certificated securities, or the delivery of the officer’s certificate in the case of uncertificated securities, then from and after the date of the deposit (although before the date fixed for redemption) the shares
 called
 shall be redeemed and the dividends on those shares shall cease to accrue after the date fixed for redemption. The deposit shall constitute full payment of the shares to their holders and from and after the date of the deposit the shares shall no longer be outstanding and the holders thereof shall cease to be shareholders with respect to the shares and shall have no rights with respect thereto except the right to receive from the bank or trust company payment of the redemption price of the shares without interest, upon surrender of their certificates therefor, in the case of certificated securities, and any right to convert the shares which may exist and then continue for any period fixed by its terms.

In determining the holders of uncertificated securities, the bank or trust company shall be entitled to rely on any officer’s certificate deposited
 with it in accordance with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 13.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

510.

(a) When a corporation reacquires its own shares, those shares are restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares, unless the articles prohibit the reissuance thereof.

(b) When a corporation reacquires authorized shares of a class or series and the articles prohibit the reissuance of those shares:

(1) If all of the authorized shares of that class or series, as the case may be, are reacquired, then (A) that
 class or series is automatically eliminated, (B) in the case of reacquisition of all of the authorized shares of a series, the authorized number of shares of the class to which the shares belonged is reduced by the number of shares so reacquired, and (C) the articles shall be amended to eliminate any statement of rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions relating solely to that class or series.

(2) If less than all of the authorized shares but all of the issued and outstanding shares of that class or series, as the case may be, are reacquired, the authorized number of shares of the class or series is automatically reduced by the number of shares so reacquired, and the board shall determine either (A) to eliminate that class or series, whereupon the articles shall be amended to eliminate any statement of rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions relating solely to that class or series, or (B) not to eliminate that class or
 series, whereupon the articles shall be amended to reflect that reduction of the number of authorized shares of that class or series by the shares so reacquired.

(3) If less than all of the authorized shares and less than all of the issued and outstanding shares of a class or series, as the case may be, are reacquired, the authorized number of shares of that class or series shall be automatically reduced by the number of shares reacquired, and the articles shall be amended to reflect that reduction.

(c) When a corporation reacquires authorized shares of a series of shares and the articles only prohibit the reissuance of those shares as shares of the same series:

(1) If all of the authorized shares of that series are reacquired, then that series is automatically eliminated, the articles shall be amended to eliminate
 any statement of rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions relating solely to that series, and the board shall determine either (A) to return those shares to the status of authorized but undesignated shares of the class to which they belong or (B) to eliminate those shares entirely, whereupon the articles in either case shall be amended to reflect the reduction in the authorized shares of that series and the effect, if any, on the class to which that series belongs.

(2) If all of the issued and outstanding shares of that series (but less than all of the authorized shares of that series) are reacquired, the board shall determine either (A) to eliminate that series, whereupon the articles shall be amended to eliminate any statement of rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions relating solely to that series, or (B) not to eliminate that series, whereupon the articles shall be amended to reflect the return of the reacquired shares
 to the status of authorized but undesignated shares of the class to which they belong.

(3) If less than all of the issued and outstanding shares of that series are reacquired, the authorized number of shares of that series shall be automatically reduced by the number of shares reacquired, and the board shall determine either (A) to return those shares to the status of authorized but undesignated shares of the class to which they belong, or (B) to eliminate those shares entirely, whereupon the articles in either case shall be amended to reflect the reduction in the authorized shares of that series and the effect, if any, on the class to which that series belongs.

(d) “Reacquires” as used in this section means that a corporation purchases, redeems, acquires by way of conversion to another class or series, or otherwise acquires its own shares or that issued and outstanding shares
 cease to be outstanding.

(e) The provisions of this section are subject to any contrary or inconsistent provision in the articles.

(f) A certificate of amendment shall be filed in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 900) reflecting any elimination or reduction of authorized shares set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c), and any related elimination from the articles of the designation and the rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions of any series or class of stock that is eliminated, except that approval by the outstanding shares (Section 152) shall not be required to adopt any such amendment. Nothing contained in this section is intended to alter or otherwise affect the powers of the board to amend the articles as contemplated in Sections 202 and 401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 154, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, a negotiable instrument issued by a corporation for the purchase or redemption of shares shall be enforceable by a holder in due course (Section 3302 of the Commercial Code) without notice that it was issued for that purpose or by a person who acquired the instrument through such a holder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 370.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Shareholders’ Meetings and Consents [600. - 605.]

600.

(a) Meetings of shareholders may be held at any place within or without this state as may be stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no other place is stated or so fixed, shareholder meetings shall be held at the principal office of the corporation. Subject to any limitations in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, if authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to those guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, shareholders not physically present in person or by proxy at a meeting of shareholders may, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, participate in a meeting of shareholders, be deemed present in person or by proxy, and vote
 at a meeting of shareholders, subject to subdivision (e).

(b) An annual meeting of shareholders shall be held for the election of directors on a date and at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. However, if the corporation is a regulated management company, a meeting of shareholders shall be held as required by the Federal Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1, et seq.). Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting. For purposes of this subdivision, “regulated management company” means a regulated investment company as defined in Section 851 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

(c) If there is a failure to hold the annual meeting for a period of 60 days after the date designated therefor or, if no date has been designated, for a period of 15 months after the organization of the corporation or after its last annual meeting,
 the superior court of the proper county may summarily order a meeting to be held upon the application of any shareholder after notice to the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard. The shares represented at the meeting, either in person or by proxy, and entitled to vote thereat shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of the meeting, notwithstanding any provision of the articles or bylaws or in this division to the contrary. The court may issue any orders as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, orders designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of shareholders entitled to vote, and the form of notice of the meeting.

(d) Special meetings of the shareholders may be called by the board, the chairperson of the board, the president, the holders of shares entitled to cast not less than 10 percent of the votes at the meeting, or any additional persons as may be provided in the articles or
 bylaws.

(e) A meeting of the shareholders may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication if the corporation implements reasonable measures: (1) to provide shareholders and proxyholders a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting concurrently with those proceedings, (2) if any shareholder or proxyholder votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, to maintain a record of that vote or action in its books and records, and (3) to verify that each person who has voted remotely is a shareholder or proxyholder. A
 corporation shall not conduct a meeting of shareholders solely by electronic transmission by and to the corporation, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication unless one or more of the following conditions apply: (A) all of the shareholders consent; (B) the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 207; or (C) notwithstanding the absence of consent from all shareholders pursuant to (A) or subdivision (b) of Section 20, the meeting includes a live audiovisual feed for the duration of the meeting. A corporation holding a meeting pursuant to (C) may offer, in addition to remote audiovisual feed, an audio-only means by which a shareholder or proxyholder may participate provided that the choice between participating via audiovisual or via audio-only means is made by the shareholder or proxyholder and the corporation does not impose any barriers to either mode of
 participation. A de minimis disruption of an audio or audiovisual feed does not require a corporation to end a shareholder meeting under, or render the corporation out of compliance with, this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   (AB 2908)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

(a) Whenever shareholders are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting a written notice of the meeting shall be given not less than 10 (or, if sent by third-class mail, 30) nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting to each shareholder entitled to vote thereat. That notice shall state the place, date and hour of the meeting, the means of electronic transmission by and to the corporation (Sections 20 and 21), electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication, if any, by which shareholders may participate in that meeting, and (1) in the case of a special meeting, the general nature of the business to be transacted, and no other business may be transacted, or (2) in the case
 of the annual meeting, those matters that the board, at the time of the mailing of the notice, intends to present for action by the shareholders, but subject to the provisions of subdivision (f) any proper matter may be presented at the meeting for that action. The notice of any meeting at which directors are to be elected shall include the names of nominees intended at the time of the notice to be presented by the board for election.

(b) (1) Notice of a shareholders’ meeting or any report shall be given personally, by electronic transmission by the corporation, or by first-class mail, or, in the case of a corporation with outstanding shares held of record by 500 or more persons (determined as provided in Section 605) on the record date for the shareholders’ meeting, notice may also be sent third-class mail, or
 other means of written communication, addressed to the shareholder at the address of that shareholder appearing on the books of the corporation or given by the shareholder to the corporation for the purpose of notice, or if no address appears or is given, at the place where the principal office of the corporation is located or by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office is located. The notice or report shall be deemed to have been given at the time when delivered personally, sent by electronic transmission by the corporation, deposited in the mail, or sent by other means of written communication. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice of a shareholder’s meeting or any report may be sent by electronic communication or other means of remote communication if the board determines it is necessary or appropriate because of an emergency, as
 defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 207. An affidavit of mailing or electronic transmission by the corporation, or electronic communication or other means of remote communication as permitted because of an emergency, of any notice or report in accordance with the provisions of this division, executed by the secretary, assistant secretary, or any transfer agent, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of the notice or report.

(2) If any notice or report addressed to the shareholder at the address of that shareholder appearing on the books of the corporation is returned to the corporation by the United States Postal Service marked to indicate that the United States Postal Service is unable to deliver the notice or report to the shareholder at that address, all future notices or reports shall be deemed to have been
 duly given without further mailing if the same shall be available for the shareholder upon written demand of the shareholder at the principal office of the corporation for a period of one year from the date of the giving of the notice or report to all other shareholders.

(3) (A) Notice given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision shall be valid only if it complies with Section 20. Notwithstanding the foregoing, notice shall not be given by electronic transmission by the corporation under this subdivision after either of the following:

(i) The corporation is unable to deliver two consecutive notices to the shareholder by that means.

(ii) The inability to so deliver
 the notices to the shareholder becomes known to the secretary, any assistant secretary, the transfer agent, or other person responsible for the giving of the notice.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if notices are provided by electronic communication or other means of remote communication as permitted because of an emergency.

(c) Upon request in writing to the corporation addressed to the attention of the chairperson of the board, president, vice president or secretary by any person (other than the board) entitled to call a special meeting of shareholders, the officer forthwith shall cause notice to be given to the shareholders entitled to vote that a meeting will be held at a time requested by the person or persons calling the meeting, not less than 35 nor more than 60 days after the receipt